Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 8.1. Derivative Proceedings and Other Shareholder Actions.

§ 13.1-672.1.
Standing; condition precedent; stay of proceedings.

A shareholder shall not commence or maintain a derivative proceeding unless the shareholder:

Was a shareholder of the corporation at the time of the act or omission complained of, became a shareholder through transfer by operation of law from one who was a shareholder at that time, or became a shareholder before public disclosure and without knowledge of the act or omission complained of;

Was a shareholder at the time the shareholder made the written demand required by subdivision B 1; and

Fairly and adequately represents the interests of the corporation in enforcing the right of the corporation.

No shareholder may commence a derivative proceeding until:

A written demand has been made on the corporation to take suitable action; and

Ninety days have expired from the date delivery of the written demand was made on the corporation unless (i) the shareholder has earlier been notified that the demand has been rejected by the corporation or (ii) irreparable injury to the corporation would result by waiting for the expiration of the 90-day period.

If the corporation commences an inquiry into the allegations made in the demand or complaint, the court may stay any derivative proceeding for such period as the court deems appropriate.

History.

1992, c. 802; 2007, c. 165; 2010, c. 782; 2019, c. 734.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165 added “and Other Shareholder Actions” to the Article 8.1 heading, substituted “shall not” for “may not” in the introductory language of subsection A, and substituted “90 days” for “ninety days” and “90-day” for “ninety-day” in subdivision B 2.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 inserted “delivery of the” in subdivision B 2.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 deleted the designations for former subdivisions A 2 and 3; inserted subdivision A 2; redesignated former subdivision A 4 as 3; rewrote subdivision B 2, which read: “Ninety days have expired from the date delivery of the demand was made unless (i) the shareholder has been notified before the expiration of 90 days that the demand has been rejected by the corporation or (ii) irreparable injury to the corporation would result by waiting until the end of the 90-day period”; and in subsection C, substituted “an inquiry into” for “a review and evaluation”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article surveying major developments between 1991 and 1992 that affect business and corporate law in Virginia, see “Business and Corporate Law,” 26 U. Rich. L. Rev. 653 (1992).

For an article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1067 (1998).

For annual survey essay, “Partnership Derivative Suits:
Jennings, v. Kay Jennings Family Ltd. Partnership
,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 167 (2009).

For article, “Corporate Governance in the Courtroom: An Empirical Analysis,” see 51 Wm. and Mary L. Rev. 1749 (2010).

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 113 (2012).

For comment, “Private Ordering in the Old Dominion: A Solution to Frivolous Litigation or the Elimination of a Fundamental Shareholder Right?” see 53 U. Rich. L. Rev. 297 (2018).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Limited Liability Companies, § 42.

§ 13.1-672.2.
Discontinuance or settlement.

A derivative proceeding may not be settled or discontinued without the court’s approval. If the court determines that a proposed discontinuance or settlement will substantially and adversely affect the interests of the corporation’s shareholders or a class or series of the corporation’s shareholders, the court shall direct that notice be given to the shareholders affected.

Notice required by subsection A shall be given in such manner as the court shall determine, and the costs of such notice shall be borne in such manner as the court shall direct.

History.

1992, c. 802; 2019, c. 734.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, substituted “may not be settled” for “shall not be settled” and “a proposed” for “the,” inserted “and adversely” and “or series” following “a class”; and in subsection B, substituted “by subsection A” for “under this section.”

§ 13.1-672.3.
Foreign corporations.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

13.1-672.1

and

13.1-672.4

, in any derivative proceeding in the right of a foreign corporation, subject to the court’s determination of whether the courts of the Commonwealth are a convenient forum for such a proceeding, the matters covered by this article shall be governed by the laws of the jurisdiction of formation of the foreign corporation except for matters covered by subsection C of §

13.1-672.1

and §§

13.1-672.2

and

13.1-672.5

.

History.

1992, c. 802; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this state.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote this Code section, which read: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

13.1-672.1

and

13.1-672.4

, in any derivative proceeding in the right of a foreign corporation, subject to the court’s determination of whether the courts of the Commonwealth are a convenient forum for such a proceeding, determinations of (i) standing and satisfaction of conditions precedent to commencing and maintaining derivative proceedings and (ii) grounds for dismissal of derivative proceedings, shall be governed by the laws of the foreign corporation’s state of incorporation.”

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Delaware law governed shareholders’ derivative claims. —

Since the corporation was incorporated under the laws of Delaware, Delaware law governed shareholders’ derivative claims alleging conspiracy to deprive the shareholders of their investment value through default on a loan to a debtor entity that stockholders owned and controlled for purposes of the stockholders’ demurrer and pleas of statute of limitations. Parsch v. Massey, 72 Va. Cir. 121, 2006 Va. Cir. LEXIS 304 (Charlottesville Oct. 4, 2006).

§ 13.1-672.4.
Dismissal.

A derivative proceeding shall be dismissed by the court on motion by the corporation if one of the groups specified in subsection B or E has:

Conducted a review and evaluation, adequately informed in the circumstances, of the allegations made in the demand or complaint;

Determined in good faith on the basis of that review and evaluation that the maintenance of the derivative proceeding is not in the best interests of the corporation; and

Submitted in support of the motion a short and concise statement of the reasons for its determination.

Unless a panel is appointed pursuant to subsection E, the determination in subsection A shall be made by:

A majority vote of disinterested directors present at a meeting of the board of directors if the disinterested directors constitute a quorum; or

A majority vote of a committee consisting of two or more disinterested directors appointed by a majority vote of disinterested directors present at a meeting of the board of directors, regardless of whether such disinterested directors constituted a quorum.

If a derivative proceeding is commenced after a determination has been made rejecting a demand by a shareholder, the complaint shall allege with particularity facts establishing that the requirements of subsection A or B have not been met. With respect to any allegation that the requirements of subsection A or B have not been met, the plaintiff shall be entitled to discovery if, and only with respect to, facts that are alleged in the complaint with particularity.

The plaintiff shall have the burden of proving that the requirements of subsection A or B have not been met, except that the corporation shall have the burden with respect to the issue of disinterestedness under subsection B if the complaint alleges with particularity facts raising a substantial question as to such disinterestedness.

Upon motion by the corporation, the court may appoint a panel of disinterested persons to make a determination whether the maintenance of the derivative proceeding is in the best interests of the corporation.

History.

1992, c. 802; 1993, c. 233; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “subsection E” for “subsection F” in subsections A and B; substituted “disinterested” for “independent” twice in subdivision B 1 and three times in subdivision B 2; deleted former subsection C; redesignated former subsections D through F as present subsections C through E; and added “The” at the beginning of the last sentence in present subsection C.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision B 2, substituted “regardless of whether such” for “whether or not such”; in subsections C and D, inserted “or B” in the first sentence; in subsection C, inserted “With respect to any allegation that the requirements of subsection A or B have not been met” and “if, and only” and substituted “facts that are alleged in the complaint” for “the issues presented by the motion only if and to the extent that the complaint alleges such, facts”; in subsection D, substituted “disinterestedness” for “independent” twice; in subsection E, inserted “Upon motion by the corporation” and substituted “disinterested persons” for “independent persons upon motion by the corporation.”

§ 13.1-672.5.
Payment of and security for expenses.

On termination of a derivative proceeding, the court may:

Order the corporation to pay the plaintiff’s expenses incurred in the proceeding if it finds that the proceeding has resulted in a substantial benefit to the corporation; or

Order the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney to pay the corporation’s or any defendant’s expenses incurred in defending the proceeding if it finds that the proceeding was commenced or maintained arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith.

History.

1992, c. 802; 1993, c. 233; 2019, c. 734.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 substituted “may” for “shall” in the introductory paragraph; substituted “expenses” for “reasonable expenses (including counsel fees)” throughout; in subdivision 2, inserted “the corporation’s or” following “to pay.”

§ 13.1-672.6.
Shareholder action to appoint a custodian or receiver for a public corporation.

The circuit court in any city or county where a public corporation’s principal office is or was last located, or, if none in the Commonwealth, where its registered office is or was last located may appoint one or more persons to be custodians, or, if the corporation is insolvent, to be receivers, of and for a public corporation in a proceeding by a shareholder where it is established that:

The directors are deadlocked in the management of the corporate affairs, the shareholders are unable to break the deadlock, and irreparable injury to the corporation is threatened or being suffered; or

The directors or those in control of the corporation are acting fraudulently and irreparable injury to the corporation is threatened or being suffered.

The court:

May issue injunctions, appoint a temporary custodian or temporary receiver with all the powers and duties the court directs, take other action to preserve the corporate assets wherever located, and carry on the business of the corporation until a full hearing is held;

Shall hold a hearing, after notifying all parties to the proceeding and any interested persons designated by the court, before appointing a custodian or receiver; and

Has jurisdiction over the corporation and all of its property, wherever located.

The court may appoint an individual or domestic or foreign corporation, authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth, as a custodian or receiver and may require the custodian or receiver to post bond, with or without sureties, in an amount the court directs.

The court shall describe the powers and duties of the custodian or receiver in its appointing order, which may be amended from time to time. Among other powers:

A custodian may exercise all of the powers of the corporation, through or in place of its board of directors, to the extent necessary to manage the business and affairs of the corporation; and

A receiver (i) may dispose of all or any part of the assets of the corporation wherever located, at a public or private sale, if authorized by the court, and (ii) may sue and defend in the receiver’s own name as receiver in all courts of the Commonwealth.

The court during a custodianship may redesignate the custodian a receiver, and during a receivership may redesignate the receiver a custodian, if doing so is in the best interests of the corporation.

The court from time to time during the custodianship or receivership may order compensation paid and expense disbursements or reimbursements made to the custodian or receiver from the assets of the corporation or proceeds from the sale of its assets.

History.

2007, c. 165; 2019, c. 734.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection E, substituted “redesignate” for “designate”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

§ 13.1-672.7.
Shareholder defined.

As used in this article, “shareholder” means a record shareholder, a beneficial shareholder, and a voting trust beneficial owner whose entitlement to bring the proceeding under this article is not inconsistent with the voting trust agreement.

History.

2019, c. 734.